Wyoming statutes. Title 36 State Lands
Chapter 5 Leasing Generally
§ 36-5-105.
Criteria for leasing; preferences; assignments, subleases or contracts; lands taken for war purposes; mineral lands excepted; agricultural lands.

All state lands leased by the state board of land commissioners, for grazing and other agricultural purposes shall be leased in such manner and to such parties as shall inure to the greatest benefit to the state land trust beneficiaries.

No applicant shall be qualified to lease vacant lands unless that applicant is qualified under the provisions of W.S.

36-5-101

, has actual and necessary use for the land, has or can gain access to the land and offers to pay an annual rental at not less than fair market value, as determined by the economic analysis pursuant to W.S.

36-5-101

(b), for the same or similar use of the land for a period of ten (10) years and who has not been found to have significantly violated any laws or regulations related to state lands. Also in leasing vacant lands:

Preference shall be given to applicants who are the owners, lessees or lawful occupants of adjoining lands, unless the board determines that the preference should not be recognized for good cause. The preference shall be administered as set forth in this paragraph:

In instances where one (1) applicant is eligible for the preference and a competing bidder is not, the applicant eligible for the preference may elect to meet the highest bid of the applicants not eligible for the preference;

When two (2) or more applicants are eligible for the preference, in determining to which applicant to award the lease, the director shall request a final bid from the applicants eligible for the preference in a manner as directed by the director to determine the successful applicant;

When two (2) or more applicants are eligible for the preference and one (1) or more applicants are not eligible for the preference, those applicants who are eligible for the preference may elect to match the highest bid. If two (2) or more applicants who are eligible for the preference elect to meet the highest bid, the lease shall be awarded pursuant to subparagraph (B) of this paragraph.

Before accepting applications to lease vacant land, the director shall provide notice on the website of the office, directly to each adjoining private landowner as recorded within the county assessor’s office and by any other means as prescribed by rule;

If the board determines good cause exists not to recognize a preference under paragraph (i) of this subsection, the board shall issue written notice to the applicant who is not being given a preference. The notice shall include the board’s statement of good cause not to recognize the preference and the opportunity to request a hearing to appeal the determination in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. The board shall have the burden to demonstrate the good cause not to recognize the preference;

As used in this subsection:

“Preference” means the elevated position of an applicant to participate in the vacant land bidding process as described in paragraph (i) of this subsection above applicants who are not the owners, lessees or lawful occupants of adjoining lands in good standing with the board;

“Vacant land” means land not currently subject to a grazing and agricultural lease from the board.

An applicant who is the holder of an expiring lease, and has paid the rental when due, and has not violated the provisions of the lease, and is qualified under the provisions of W.S.

36-5-101

, shall have a preferred right to renew such lease by meeting the highest bid offered by another qualified applicant who has actual and necessary use for the land and available forage and whose bid is not less than the minimum fair market value as determined by the board for the same or a similar use of land using the formula developed pursuant to W.S.

36-5-101

(b) and not more than one hundred twenty percent (120%) of the maximum fair market value as determined by the board based on the previous year’s values for the state, district or county, whichever is most localized and available, as determined by the national agricultural statistics service utilizing:

The private land lease rate per animal unit month for Wyoming grazing leases; or

The private land irrigated or nonirrigated cropland lease rate, as applicable, for Wyoming cropland leases on irrigated or nonirrigated cropland; and

A downward adjustment of twenty percent (20%) to reasonably reflect lessee contributions typically provided as a part of a private land grazing lease rate or a private cropland lease rate, as applicable.

If the lessee of state lands shall assign, sublease or contract all or any part of the lease area, the lease shall be subject to cancellation unless such assignment or sublease or contract is approved by the director, subject to criteria established by the board of land commissioners; however, no such approval shall be arbitrarily or unreasonably withheld and all action upon each application therefor, shall be such as will inure to the greatest benefit to the state land trust beneficiaries, provided, that in no event shall the lands be subleased unless one-half (1/2) of the excess rental is paid to the state.

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 111, § 2.

Provided further, that whenever any state owned lands have been or may hereafter be condemned or acquired by the United States for war purposes and whenever said lands may hereafter be reconveyed to the state of Wyoming by the said United States or any department thereof, then in such event the state board of land commissioners shall give preference to the lessee holding said lands at the time of the taking of said lands by the said United States or any department thereof.

Provided further, that this act shall not be applicable to the leasing of state mineral lands under the provisions of W.S.

36-6-101

through

36-6-105

, as amended.

As used in subsection (c) of this section, “preferred right” means the right to renew a lease provided to an existing holder of a grazing and agricultural lease by the board if the existing lease holder is in compliance with subsection (c) of this section.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 108, § 13; 1931, ch. 45, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 91-113; Laws 1943, ch. 60, § 1; 1945, ch. 34, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 24-113; W.S. 1957, § 36-66; Laws 1967, ch. 223, § 1; 1997, ch. 200, § 1; 2007, ch. 111, §§ 1, 2; 2009, ch. 157, § 1; 2022 ch. 89, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, redesignated former (a) as present (a) through (c) and redesignated the existing paragraphs accordingly; in present (a) deleted “Except as herein provided” at the end of the paragraph; in present (b) inserted “In leasing vacant lands”; in present (c) substituted “by another qualified applicant who has actual and necessary use for the land and available forage and whose bid” for “which”; and repealed former (e), which pertained to further provision of
the state board of land commissioners in the leasing of state agricultural lands in such manner and to such parties as shall inure to the greatest benefit to the state land trust beneficiaries.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (c), substituted “not less than the minimum fair market value as determined by the board” for “based on the fair market value using the formula developed by the board pursuant to W.S. 36 5 101(b)” and added the provisions beginning with “using the formula” at the end; and added (c)(i) through (c)(iii).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, in (b), substituted “No applicant shall be qualified to lease vacant lands unless that applicant is” for “In leasing vacant lands, preference shall in all cases be given to applicants who are bona fide resident citizens of the state,” “has” for “and to persons or legal entities authorized to transact business in the state, having" following “of W.S.

36-5-101

,” added “, has or can gain access to the land,” substituted “offers” for “who are the owners, lessees or lawful occupants of adjoining lands, who offer,” added “same or similar,” deleted “the forage or other commodity available annually on” preceding “the land for a,” added “and who has not been found to have significantly violated any laws or regulations related to state lands,” added the second sentence; added (b)(i) through (b)(iv); and added (h).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in (d), see § 36-1-101(a)(viii).

Legislative history of section. —

See Bosler v. McKechnie, 362 P.2d 809,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 1961).

Section supersedes §

36-5-108

to extent of conflict. —

This section with its preference in all cases for “lawful occupants” of adjoining land, has superseded §

36-5-108

to such extent as there may be a conflict. Risha v. Willadsen, 397 P.2d 803,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 137

(Wyo. 1964).

Preference not unconstitutional. —

Giving preference to old lessee in applications for leases of school land is not unconstitutional as giving an absolute right of renewal. Mercer v. Thorley, 48 Wyo. 141, 43 P.2d 692,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1935).

No vested right to renewal. —

Former statute entitling lessee of state lands to renewal of lease for five year periods, aggregating 20 years, did not give lessee of school lands granted to state by act of admission vested right to renewal, since that would violate condition on which school lands were granted to state. State ex rel. Huckfeldt v. State Bd. of Sch. Land Comm'rs, 20 Wyo. 162, 122 P. 94,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1912).

Board is only authority vested with power to lease

state lands. Banzhaf v. Swan Co., 60 Wyo. 201, 148 P.2d 225,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1944).

Section becomes binding when board decides to lease. —

The provisions of law in this section become binding upon the board's action if and when it decides to lease school lands. Mayor v. Board of Land Comm'rs, 64 Wyo. 409, 192 P.2d 403,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 64 Wyo. 430, 195 P.2d 752 (Wyo. 1948).

Discretion of board

in both leasing and sale of school lands of state has been given very broad scope subject only to the limitation that review by the courts may be had of its action in the event of the board's transgression of provisions of positive law, fraud or having committed a grave abuse of that discretion. Whether the board has exceeded this limitation must be determined from the varying circumstances of individual cases. Mayor v. Board of Land Comm'rs, 64 Wyo. 409, 192 P.2d 403,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 64 Wyo. 430, 195 P.2d 752 (Wyo. 1948).

In leasing state lands, board exercises wide discretion which should be controlling except in case of illegal exercise thereof, or fraud or grave abuse of such discretion. Banzhaf v. Swan Co., 60 Wyo. 201, 148 P.2d 225,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1944).

Former § 91-113, R.S. 1931, provided that the greater revenue to the state should be considered. That clause was left out of the present statute, although, of course, the greatest revenue might still be involved in the greatest benefit. But the change in the statute seems to show that the legislature meant to increase the discretion of the board. Frolander v. Ilsley, 72 Wyo. 342, 264 P.2d 790,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1953).

What is greatest benefit to state is matter within sound discretion of board, and in the absence of abuse of discretion, or fraud or illegal action, the supreme court would be compelled to uphold the lower court and the board. Thompson v. Conwell, 363 P.2d 927,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 110

(Wyo. 1961).

Judgment of board judicial in character. —

The exercise of the power conferred upon the board to lease the lands of the state to parties which shall inure to the greatest benefit, and secure the largest revenue to the state, requires judgment and discretion. No inflexible rule is laid down for the guidance of the board in those matters. The judgment and discretion to be exercised is judicial in character, and in an application for the writ of mandamus, it is not proper for the supreme court to interpose its opinion and judgment in the place of that of the board, even if the conclusion which the latter has reached upon the facts should appear to have been erroneous. Jassman v. Wulfjen, 71 Wyo. 261, 257 P.2d 334,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1953).

But board must consider preference right of renewal. —

By the preference right of renewal contained in this section, the legislature has, in this instance, distinctly limited or regulated the board's discretion. It must take into consideration that right. Frolander v. Ilsley, 72 Wyo. 342, 264 P.2d 790,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1953).

And state policy to recognize equities in ranching business. —

This section clearly shows that the legislature meant to make it the policy of the state to recognize equities in those who have built up a ranching business in the state which should be considered in passing upon applications for renewal of expiring leases, and that the absence of such policy would be injurious, if not destructive, to that industry. Stauffer v. Johnson, 71 Wyo. 386, 259 P.2d 753,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1953).

Under this section boards' discretion in granting renewal of lease of agricultural school land must be governed by policy of state to recognize equities in those who have built up ranching business. Kerrigan v. Miller, 53 Wyo. 441, 84 P.2d 724,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1938); Frolander v. Ilsley, 72 Wyo. 342, 264 P.2d 790,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1953).

But granting of renewal lease not mandatory. —

Contention that when an applicant for the lease of state school lands who is in all respects qualified to hold it as a renewal lessee presents his application for such a lease to the board that body must grant the lease and may not under any circumstances decline to issue it to him could not be sustained. Mayor v. Board of Land Comm'rs, 64 Wyo. 409, 192 P.2d 403,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 64 Wyo. 430, 195 P.2d 752 (Wyo. 1948).

Preference renewal right should not be rejected on slight, trivial or technical grounds,

but only when the board finds, on sound grounds, that the greatest benefit to the state would not be subserved by granting it. The board has a large discretion, which can be overturned only if there is a violation of law, or fraud, or illegal exercise of discretion or an abuse of discretion. Frolander v. Ilsley, 72 Wyo. 342, 264 P.2d 790,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1953).

Preferred applicant not required to be holder of expiring lease. —

This section does not expressly state that an applicant must be the holder of an expiring lease from the state in order to be entitled to a preference as the old lessee. Risha v. Willadsen, 397 P.2d 803,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 137

(Wyo. 1964).

Person having only oral license or permission to graze livestock is “lawful occupant”

of adjoining sections of land within the meaning of this section. Risha v. Willadsen, 397 P.2d 803,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 137

(Wyo. 1964).

Requirement of leasing for greatest benefit qualified by preference right of renewal. —

Subsection (e) qualifies all preferences by making a further proviso that lands are to be leased to such parties as shall inure to the greatest benefit to the state. However, this qualification is itself limited by a proviso to the effect that the owner of an expiring lease shall have a preferred right to renew such lease. Therefore, even the legislative directive to lease for the greatest benefit to the state is still specifically made contingent upon the old lessee having a preferred right to renew his lease. Thompson v. Conwell, 363 P.2d 927,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 110

(Wyo. 1961).

Which section gives qualified person. —

This section, on its face, and in the absence of violation of the lease, and when the rental has been paid, gives precedence to the right of renewal to a qualified person. Bosler v. McKechnie, 362 P.2d 809,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 1961); Thompson v. Conwell, 363 P.2d 927,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 110

(Wyo. 1961).

And which is superior to right of applicant claiming on basis of need. —

In subsection (a), the preference afforded to applicants having actual and necessary use for the land and who are the owners of adjoining lands is limited by the words “Except as herein provided.” Then it is expressly stated in a proviso clause that the owner of an expiring lease shall have a preferred right to renew such lease. That language clearly gives the old lessee the first priority ahead of applicants claiming on the basis of a need and owning adjoining lands. Thompson v. Conwell, 363 P.2d 927,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 110

(Wyo. 1961).

Refusing such preference deemed detriment to state's interest. —

What the legislature meant in the 1945 amendment to this section is that the refusal to give effect to the preference right of renewal is a detriment to the interest of the state. Bosler v. McKechnie, 362 P.2d 809,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 1961).

Exception to preference right of renewal. —

See Howard v. Lindmier, 67 Wyo. 78, 214 P.2d 737,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1950).

New applicant favored over former lessee. —

Where new applicant owned land adjoining leased land, had livestock and needed land, board was justified in holding that best interest of state required lease of land to new applicant instead of to former lessee less favorably situated. Kerrigan v. Miller, 53 Wyo. 441, 84 P.2d 724,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1938).

Unnecessary for applicant to have land adjoining. —

Board acted under misapprehension of law in rejecting applications for grazing leases on ground that applicants had no land adjoining that applied for. Sullivan Co. v. Meer, 58 Wyo. 90, 125 P.2d 168,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1942).

Only lands in vicinity required. —

To obtain preferential rights applicant for lease need not own adjoining lands; all that is required is that he has lands in vicinity of that applied for. Sullivan Co. v. Meer, 58 Wyo. 90, 125 P.2d 168,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1942).

Section does not require applicant use land by own livestock. —

This section does not, in terms at least, require that a party with a preference right of renewal and applying for renewal of an expiring lease must necessarily use the leasehold herself by means of her own livestock, and the supreme court has no right to read such a provision into it. Frolander v. Ilsley, 72 Wyo. 342, 264 P.2d 790,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1953).

Long use of state lands

by an applicant, when no renewal lease is involved, tends to show that use was “necessary” within section, so as to grant as preferential right. Sullivan Co. v. Meer, 58 Wyo. 90, 125 P.2d 168,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1942).

Absolute necessity not required. —

This section does not contemplate absolute necessity in order to entitle applicant for state land lease to preferential right. Sullivan Co. v. Meer, 58 Wyo. 90, 125 P.2d 168,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1942).

Consideration of need. —

In proceeding before land commissioner (now board) testimony in record was held ample to justify court in finding certain sheep were property of lessee's estate and that it needed land in controversy to graze them. Hogan v. Greenfield, 58 Wyo. 13, 122 P.2d 850,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1942).

Provision that preference shall be given to citizens

and taxpayers is required to be followed only where other things are equal and does not mean that in all cases and under all circumstances alien's or nontaxpayer's application must be rejected in favor of citizen or taxpayer. Cooper v. McCormick, 10 Wyo. 379, 69 P. 301,

1902 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1902).

Individual deemed resident citizen. —

Applicant for renewal of state land lease who registered to vote for 1942 election in Wyoming, where he maintained office and home and lived practically all his life, was resident citizen even though he voted in Montana several years before. Hawks v. Creswell, 60 Wyo. 1, 144 P.2d 129,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1943).

Grant of lease to nonresident. —

Where rival claimants both had a need for state land, but one was a nonresident, a lease on state land granted by the board to the nonresident who, together with her predecessors in interest, had a lease on the property for many years past, was not invalid in view of the provision of this section that preference in state leasing should be given to bona fide resident citizens of the state, since the board must be assumed to have known the law on this point, to have obeyed it and, in its deliberations, to have considered both the citizenship of the nonresident and her previous relationship as lessee, as well as all facts and circumstances relating to the needs, uses and benefits of each of the parties and of the people of the state of Wyoming. Jassman v. Wulfjen, 71 Wyo. 261, 257 P.2d 334,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1953).

Title passing under will. —

Where title to state land leases passed to stepson and his nephews under residuary clause of stepmother's will, stepson with nephews' consent continuing to operate same, and where value thereof was not needed to pay estate debts, stepson was holder of expiring leases, notwithstanding failure of administratrix's final report and order discharging her to mention them. Hawks v. Creswell, 60 Wyo. 1, 144 P.2d 129,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1943).

Preferential rights pass to estate or representative of deceased lessee. —

State school land leases and preferential rights thereunder pass to estate or representative of deceased and not to his heirs. Hogan v. Greenfield, 58 Wyo. 13, 122 P.2d 850,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1942).

Section

36-5-101

is broad enough to permit lease and rights thereunder to pass to estate or representative of deceased lessee and, right of preference being property right, such representative becomes applicant entitled to preference in applying for renewal. Hogan v. Greenfield, 58 Wyo. 13, 122 P.2d 850,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1942).

Covenant against subletting not violated. —

Old lessees who during period of old lease had entered into written agreements to rent leased state land for pasturage in excess of yearly rent paid to the state were not guilty of fraud in answering “No” to question in application for new state lease as to whether they had ever subleased said lands for a cash consideration in excess of the rental paid to the state without payment of 1/2 of such excess to the state, or in failing to file copies of the written agreements in regard to pasturage or in failing to divide with the state the amounts received under the agreement, since the agreements did not violate covenant against subletting. Stauffer v. Johnson, 71 Wyo. 386, 259 P.2d 753,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1953).

Misstatement of fact in application to renew expiring lease,

resulting from change made without party's knowledge, would not deprive that party of a new lease. Frolander v. Ilsley, 72 Wyo. 342, 264 P.2d 790,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1953).

An inaccurate statement of the record title to land in which party applying for renewal of expiring lease had interest was a technicality since board had facts before it and did not cause forfeiture of party's right of preference. Frolander v. Ilsley, 72 Wyo. 342, 264 P.2d 790,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1953).

Section does not give any preference right to the first party complying therewith.

The board fixes the rental. It may reject any offer that is made and demand a higher rental, at least one not exceeding the maximum rental fixed by rule. Frolander v. Ilsley, 72 Wyo. 342, 264 P.2d 790,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1953).

Under section amount of rental offered must be considered

by board in leasing state lands, notwithstanding that offer exceeds reasonable rental value fixed by board. Sullivan Co. v. Meer, 58 Wyo. 90, 125 P.2d 168,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1942).

Highest rental offer. —

Where no renewal lease is involved, offer of the highest rental must be taken into consideration by board though it is not the sole factor. Sullivan Co. v. Meer, 58 Wyo. 90, 125 P.2d 168,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1942).

District court's action which reversed board's decision denying two applications for leases of parts of tract awarded by it to another applicant held not error in view of higher rental offered by the denied applicants. Sullivan Co. v. Meer, 58 Wyo. 90, 125 P.2d 168,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1942).

Where contesting applicant offered $.05 per acre as rental charge, there was no abuse of discretion on part of board in making award of leases to applicant who offered $.125 per acre. Brown v. Wintermute, 59 Wyo. 254, 139 P.2d 435,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1943).

Renewal applicant required to match higher bid. —

Pursuant to this section, Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 36-5-101(b), and Wyo. Bd. Land Comm'rs Rules, ch. 4, § 6, a party seeking to exercise its preferential right to renew a state lease was properly required to match a competing applicant's higher bid. Fair market value was established by the higher bid, without any maximum limit.
Office of State Lands & Invs. v. Mule Shoe Ranch, Inc., 2011 WY 68, 252 P.3d 951,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 2011).

Renewal at same rental. —

Where lessee is entitled to renewal on ground of reclamation of land, he is entitled to such renewal at same rental as that stipulated in original lease under which reclamation occurred. State ex rel. Harrison v. State Bd. of Land Comm'rs, 10 Wyo. 413, 69 P. 562,

1902 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1902) (decided under prior law).

Increased rental on renewal. —

On trial of conflicting land lease applications, court did not err in directing successful applicant for renewal leases to pay, and board to receive from him, reasonable increase in rental equal to that offered by unsuccessful applicants. Hawks v. Creswell, 60 Wyo. 1, 144 P.2d 129,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1943).

Where party having preference right under section offered to pay rental below minimum limit

in application to renew expiring lease, there was no violation of this section in loss of preference right, since provision requiring offer of rental within minimum and maximum limits refers to parties other than those who have a preference right. Frolander v. Ilsley, 72 Wyo. 342, 264 P.2d 790,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1953).

Issuing lease without competitive bidding. —

State oil land lease issued to developing occupant without competitive bidding was not against public policy under former C.S. 1920, §§ 699 and 706, as it was proper exercise of board's discretion to encourage improvement of the property. Miller v. Hurley, 37 Wyo. 344, 262 P. 238,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1927).

Cancelling lease. —

Although information furnished board in application for lease by other parties within a mile of tract applied for was untrue, board was not required to cancel lease in contest proceeding in absence of showing state had been damaged thereby or that contestant's interest had been injuriously affected. Bucknum v. Johnson, 21 Wyo. 26, 127 P. 904,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1912).

Board's discretion in renewing leases should not be interfered with by courts

except in cases of fraud or grave abuse resulting in manifest wrong or injustice. Baker v. Brown, 12 Wyo. 198, 74 P. 94,

1903 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1903).

Review of board's discretion on appeal. —

Trial before district court is de novo and judgment of trial court cannot be entirely ignored as to facts which first appeared there, but discretion of board is not thereby wiped out on appeal and that of trial judge substituted. Sullivan Co. v. Meer, 58 Wyo. 90, 125 P.2d 168,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1942).

Trial de novo mentioned in §

36-2-206

is limited to determination by district court whether, on facts proved, there was “an illegal exercise” of board's discretion, fraud or “grave abuse of such discretion.” Banzhaf v. Swan Co., 60 Wyo. 201, 148 P.2d 225,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1944).

Jurisdiction of court. —

Where board had executed lease for state lands to a person and relator contended that lands were wrongfully leased, lessee not being party to proceeding, court was without jurisdiction to order cancellation of lease, and board should not be required to execute another lease for same land. State ex rel. Marsh v. State Land Comm'rs, 7 Wyo. 478, 53 P. 292,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1898).

Burden of proof. —

Burden devolves upon unsuccessful applicant for state land lease to show that successful renewal applicant had “subleased for a cash consideration in excess of rental paid to the state.” Hawks v. Creswell, 60 Wyo. 1, 144 P.2d 129,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1943).

Affirmance by court required. —

Where board, in exercising its discretionary power, leased state lands to qualified corporation holding expired lease and neither exercised its discretion illegally nor gravely abused it, and no fraud is proved, board action must be affirmed. Banzhaf v. Swan Co., 60 Wyo. 201, 148 P.2d 225,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1944).

Board did not abuse its discretion in approving lease of state land to old lessee

in preference to three other applicants where testimony showed that land had been classified as grazing land; that it was for the good of the state that it remain so; that the old lessee had complied with all provisions of the old lease and that he had actual use for the land. Hoy v. Frederick, 70 Wyo. 496, 252 P.2d 112,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1953).

The board did not grossly or at all abuse its discretion and there was no “illegal exercise” of board's discretion in approving lease of land to old lessees for $320 annual rent though rival applicant offered $3,500 for lease of land for grazing purposes, where the evidence showed that old lessees had increased the value of the land from $2.00 an acre to $70.00 an acre and security of old lessee's ranch was dependent on lease of state land. Stauffer v. Johnson, 71 Wyo. 386, 259 P.2d 753,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1953).

Evidence sustaining preference. —

Evidence showing that to deprive applicant for renewal of state land leases of land included therein which its owners had held many years would depreciate remaining property and inflict severe hardships sustained finding warranting lease to him in preference to others. Hawks v. Creswell, 60 Wyo. 1, 144 P.2d 129,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1943).

Where evidence shows board was not misled by any statements of applicants to whom lease of state lands was awarded, board did not abuse its discretion in so awarding lease. Brown v. Wintermute, 59 Wyo. 254, 139 P.2d 435,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1943).

Lump sum rental. —

Where lump sum rental was received for deeded and leased lands, conclusion of board and district court that there had been no violation of terms of expiring leases will be respected. Hawks v. Creswell, 60 Wyo. 1, 144 P.2d 129,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1943).

Although appellant had standing to challenge the constitutionality of the preferential right-to-renew statute, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

36-5-105

, governing the preferential leasing of school lands, appellant failed to prove that the statute violated any constitutional or fiduciary restraints on the State's management of the school lands. Riedel v. Anderson, 2003 WY 70, 70 P.3d 223,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 2003).

Applied

in

Reese v. Bruegger Ranches, Inc., 463 P.2d 23,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 172

(Wyo. 1969).

Quoted

in

L.L. Sheep Co. v. Potter, 67 Wyo. 348, 224 P.2d 496,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(1950).

Cited

in

Rayburne v. Queen, 78 Wyo. 359, 326 P.2d 1108,

1958 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(1958); Curtis v. Center Realty Co., 502 P.2d 365,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 281

(Wyo. 1972); Riedel v. Anderson, 972 P.2d 586,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1999).

Law reviews. —

For article,“Scope of Review of Decision of an Administrative Agency in Wyoming,” see 9 Wyo. L.J. 65 (1954).

For comment, “Wyoming's Last Great Range War: The Modern Debate Over the State's Public School Lands,” see XXXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 75 (1999).

Library References. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition § 63.01 (Matthew Bender).

§ 36-5-106.
Richard Bridge historical park; Oregon Trail State Veterans’ Cemetery buffer zone; veterans’ home and skilled nursing facility buffer zone.

The state board of land commissioners is hereby authorized, if after investigation and study the board deems it to the best interest of the state of Wyoming, to enter into a lease agreement with the town of Evansville, Wyoming, for a portion of the land belonging to the state of Wyoming lying south of the centerline of the North Platte River in section 36, township 34 north, range 79 west of the sixth principal meridian, Natrona county, Wyoming. The lease authorized herein shall contain a clause restricting the use of the leased property to historical landmark, park, recreation, museum and municipal purposes. The land leased shall be known as Richard Bridge historical park.

The state board of land commissioners is hereby authorized to enter into a lease agreement for the portions of land belonging to the state of Wyoming in Natrona county, Wyoming, one (1) portion of land described as follows: the NW 1/4 of the NW 1/4 and the NE 1/4 of the NW 1/4 and part of the NW 1/4 of the NE 1/4 and part of the SE 1/4 of the NE 1/4 and part of the SW 1/4 of the NE 1/4 and part of the SE 1/4 of the NW 1/4 and part of the SW 1/4 of the NW 1/4 and part of the NE 1/4 of the SW 1/4 and part of the NW 1/4 of the SE 1/4 and part of the NE 1/4 of the SE 1/4 and part of the SE 1/4 of the SE 1/4 of section 36, township 34 north, range 79 west, also known as all lying north of the centerline of the North Platte river except 115.998 acres in the NE 1/4, containing 266.34 acres, and one (1) portion of land located and being a portion of lot 1 in the NW 1/4 of section 31, township 34 north, range 78 west containing 19.63 acres. The state lands described in this subsection shall not be otherwise disposed of, and any lease authorized herein shall contain a clause restricting the use of the leased property to grazing purposes only so long as the Oregon Trail State Veterans’ Cemetery exists in the adjacent location. The land leased shall be known as the Oregon Trail State Veterans’ Cemetery buffer zone.

The state board of land commissioners is hereby authorized to enter into a lease agreement for the portions of land belonging to the state of Wyoming in Johnson county, Wyoming, described as follows: in township 50 north, range 82 west of the sixth principal meridian part of the NE 1/4 of the NW 1/4 of section 3, the N 1/2 and SW 1/4 and NW 1/4 of the SE 1/4 and part of the NE 1/4 of the SE 1/4 and part of the SW 1/4 of the SE 1/4 of section 4 and the E 1/2 of section 5 and in township 51 north, range 82 west of the sixth principal meridian part of lot 7, part of lot 8 and part of lot 6 of section 34, containing 941.74 acres more or less. The state lands described in this subsection shall not be otherwise disposed of, and any lease authorized herein shall contain a clause restricting the use of the leased property to grazing purposes only so long as the veterans’ home of Wyoming and the Wyoming veterans’ skilled nursing facility exist in the adjacent location. The land leased shall be known as the veterans’ home and skilled nursing facility buffer zone.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 223, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 36-66.1; 2022 ch. 27, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added the (a) designation; deleted “and empowered” following “authorized” in the first sentence of (a); and added (b) and (c).

Library references. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition § 63.01 (Matthew Bender).

§ 36-5-107.
Preference in granting leases on exchanged lands.

The holder of a lease of any school, state or institutional land that is offered for exchange under section 8, of the Taylor Grazing Act [repealed], shall have preference to lease the land received in such exchange.

History.

Laws 1945, ch. 34, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 24-114; W.S. 1957, § 36-67.

Cross references. —

As to Taylor Grazing Act funds, see §

9-4-401

et seq.

Editor's notes. —

Section 8 of the federal Taylor Grazing Act, referred to in this section, was codified as 43 U.S.C. § 315g, before being repealed by Pub. L. No. 94-579, § 705(a). Section 701 of Pub. L. No. 94-579 provides: “Nothing in this act, or in any amendment made by this act, shall be construed as terminating any valid lease, permit, patent, right-of-way, or other land use right or authorization existing on the date of approval of this act.”

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Rise and Fall of Grazing Reform,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 413 (1997).

Library References. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition § 63.01 (Matthew Bender).